Vermont, session 2025-2026, H733.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 11 V.S.A. chapter 15, subchapter 3 is amended to read:
Subchapter 3. Administrative Provisions for Business Organizations
* * *
§ 1654. FRANCHISE DESIGNATION
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Filing” means an initial registration, amendment, periodic report, or
other filing with the Secretary of State as the Secretary may require.
(2) “Franchisee” and “franchisor” have the same meanings as in 16
C.F.R. § 436.1.
(b) In addition to all other requirements of a person registering with the
Secretary of State pursuant to State law, a person doing business in this State
as a franchisor or franchisee shall, at the time of a filing:
(1) indicate that the person is operating as a franchisor or franchisee;
and
(2) provide the name of the franchisor, if the person is operating as a
franchisee.
* * *
VT LEG #389070 v.1

No. 82 Page 2 of 2
2026
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
Date Governor signed bill: April 20, 2026
VT LEG #389070 v.1